Rhode Island statutes. Title 31 Motor and Other Vehicles
Chapter 50 Office of Automobile Theft and Insurance Fraud

31-50-1.
Office of automobile theft and insurance fraud — Powers and duties of investigators.

There is established an office of automobile theft and insurance fraud.

The scope and purpose of the office of automobile theft and insurance fraud shall be to investigate and prosecute crimes involving the theft or other unauthorized use of motor vehicles and to investigate and prosecute all forms of automobile insurance-related fraud.

The office of automobile theft and insurance fraud shall consist of a director, and not less than five (5) nor more than eight (8) investigators, who shall be selected and who shall be specially-trained to investigate instances of automobile theft and automobile claim insurance fraud. The director shall be a member of the Rhode Island state police with at least the rank of sergeant, and shall remain on the personnel rolls of the Rhode Island state police, with the same salary and benefits schedule, and shall retain all powers of a member of the Rhode Island state police of that rank.

The office of automobile theft and insurance fraud shall be under the jurisdiction of the superintendent of the state police. He or she shall appoint the director of that office from amongst the members of state police who have attained the rank of sergeant or above. The director, with the approval of the superintendent, shall have the authority to appoint and to remove, if necessary, the investigators and staff of the office.

The director and the investigators shall have the following powers:

To arrest independently or in conjunction with local, state or federal law enforcement agencies.

To apply for and execute search warrants;

To serve civil and criminal process.

No person shall be appointed as an investigator in the office unless he or she has successfully completed the basic course of instruction for police officers at the Providence Police Training Academy, the Rhode Island Municipal Police Training Academy, or the Rhode Island State Police Training Academy, and has at least three (3) years of active law enforcement experience, or has served as a member of the United States Marshal’s Service or as a special agent of the Federal Bureau of Investigation, a criminal law enforcement agency of the United States Department of Justice, the United States Department of State, the United States Department of the Treasury or the United States Postal Inspection Service and has at least three (3) years of active law enforcement experience, or has been certified as a police officer by the duly-constituted state commission on police officer standards and training of another state, and has at least three (3) years of active law enforcement experience. Prior to the appointment of any individuals, a background examination shall be conducted utilizing federal, state and local law enforcement agencies, bureau of criminal identification, national crime information center, and any and all relevant records existing within the federal and state court systems.

The attorney general shall designate one assistant or special assistant attorney general to the office whose duties shall be exclusively devoted to the office of automobile theft and insurance fraud. That assistant shall be funded from the account established in §

31-50-4

.

The state shall hold the director and each investigator harmless and indemnify them to the extent provided under §

9-31-12

for acts committed within the scope of their employment.

History of Section.

P.L. 1993, ch. 380, § 1; P.L. 1996, ch. 193, § 1.

31-50-2.
Board created.

There is created the automobile theft and insurance fraud investigations board, referred to in this chapter as “the board”. The board shall consist of five (5) members one of whom shall be appointed to represent the interests of consumers by the governor; one of whom shall be appointed by the attorney general; one of whom shall be appointed by the governor to represent the insurance industry; one of whom shall be appointed by the president of the Rhode Island Chiefs of Police Association; and one of whom shall be the superintendent of the state police, ex-officio, or his or her designee. The initial appointments to the positions created in this section for appointed members shall be for a term of four (4) years, three (3) years, two (2) years, and one year respectively, to be determined by the governor, and subsequently to a term of four (4) years, or until a successor is appointed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1993, ch. 380, § 1.

31-50-3.
Board — Duties and powers.

The board’s duties shall consist of overseeing said office and reviewing its effectiveness, assuring that the funds derived pursuant to §

31-50-4

are devoted to the statutory purposes established in this chapter, and preparing reports and recommendations.

History of Section.

P.L. 1993, ch. 380, § 1.

31-50-4.
Funding of office.

The director of business regulation shall fund the office of automobile theft and insurance fraud annually through those insurers authorized to write automobile insurance in the state, in proportion to their market share, in an amount equal to one dollar ($1.00) per year times the total number of registrations of vehicles having a gross weight of ten thousand pounds (10,000 lbs.) or less. Insurers may collect the amount as a policy surcharge, separately identifiable on either the policy declaration page or billing. The director is authorized by rules and regulations to raise these funds and direct the method by which payment of these charges is to be implemented. All funds collected pursuant to this section shall be deposited as general revenues.

History of Section.

P.L. 1993, ch. 380, § 1; P.L. 1995, ch. 370, art. 40, § 108; P.L. 1998, ch. 283, § 2.

31-50-5.
Annual report.

On or before the thirty-first day of January the designated assistant or special assistant attorney general and the director shall prepare and submit to the governor and to the board a comprehensive report of all of the activities of the office including, but not limited, to vehicle recovery statistics, arrests, prosecutions, convictions, and restitution.

History of Section.

P.L. 1993, ch. 380, § 1.

31-50-6.
Severability.

The provisions of this chapter are severable, and if any of its provisions shall be held unconstitutional by any court of competent jurisdiction, the decision of the court shall not affect or impair any of the remaining provisions.

History of Section.

P.L. 1993, ch. 380, § 1.